Nevada, session 83, SB157.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 678A.450 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
678A.450 1. The Board may adopt regulations necessary or
convenient to carry out the provisions of this title. Such regulations
may include, without limitation:
(a) Financial requirements for licensees.
(b) Establishing such education, outreach, investigative and
enforcement mechanisms as the Board deems necessary to ensure
the compliance of a licensee or registrant with the provisions of this
title. Such mechanisms must include, without limitation:
(1) A system to educate, train and certify employees of the
Board which:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(I) Each employee must complete before he or she may
engage in inspections, investigations or audits; and
(II) At a minimum, includes training that is the same or
substantially similar to any training that is required by the Board by
regulation to be completed by a cannabis establishment agent before
he or she may be employed by, volunteer at or provide labor to a
cannabis establishment;
(2) A system to educate and advise licensees and registrants
on compliance with the provisions of this title which may serve as
an alternative to disciplinary action; and
(3) Establishing specific grounds for disciplinary action
against a licensee or registrant who knowingly violates the law or
engages in grossly negligent, unlawful or criminal conduct or an act
or omission that poses an imminent threat to the health or safety of
the public.
(c) Requirements for licensees or registrants relating to the
cultivation, processing, manufacture, transport, distribution,
[testing,] study, advertising and sale of cannabis and cannabis
products.
(d) Policies and procedures to ensure that the cannabis industry
in this State is economically competitive, inclusive of racial
minorities, women and persons and communities that have been
adversely affected by cannabis prohibition and accessible to persons
of low-income seeking to start a business.
(e) Policies and procedures relating to the disclosure of the
identities of the shareholders and the annual report of a cannabis
establishment that is a publicly traded company.
(f) Reasonable restrictions on the signage, marketing, display
and advertising of cannabis establishments. Such a restriction must
not require a cannabis establishment to obtain the approval of the
Board before using a logo, sign or advertisement.
(g) Provisions governing the sales of products and commodities
made from hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol by cannabis establishments.
(h) Requirements relating to the packaging and labeling of
cannabis and cannabis products.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
gathering and maintenance of comprehensive demographic
information, including, without limitation, information regarding
race, ethnicity, age and gender, concerning each:
(a) Owner and manager of a cannabis establishment.
(b) Holder of a cannabis establishment agent registration card.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
3. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
investigation of unlicensed cannabis activities and the imposition of
penalties against persons who engage in such activities. Such
regulations must, without limitation:
(a) Establish penalties to be imposed for unlicensed cannabis
activities, which may include, without limitation, the issuance of a
cease and desist order or citation, the imposition of an
administrative fine or civil penalty and other similar penalties.
(b) Set forth the procedures by which the Board may impose a
penalty against a person for engaging in unlicensed cannabis
activities.
(c) Set forth the circumstances under which the Board is
required to refer matters concerning unlicensed cannabis activities
to an appropriate state or local law enforcement agency.
4. The Board shall transmit the information gathered and
maintained pursuant to subsection 2 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature on or
before January 1 of each odd-numbered year.
5. The Board shall, by regulation, establish a pilot program for
identifying opportunities for an emerging small cannabis business to
participate in the cannabis industry. As used in this subsection,
“emerging small cannabis business” means a cannabis-related
business that:
(a) Is in existence, operational and operated for a profit;
(b) Maintains its principal place of business in this State; and
(c) Satisfies requirements for the number of employees and
annual gross revenue established by the Board by regulation.
Sec. 2. Chapter 678B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations setting forth
requirements for licensees and registrants relating to the testing of
cannabis and cannabis products.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must
require:
(a) Representative samples of each lot to be tested by a
cannabis independent testing laboratory;
(b) The collection of representative samples of a lot to be
conducted in accordance with standards established by the Board,
which must align with the most recent version of the ASTM
International Standard ASTM D8334/8334M, “Standard Practice
for Sampling of Cannabis/Hemp Post-Harvest Batches for
Laboratory Analyses”; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(c) For each lot of cannabis flower, the total aggregate weight
of all representative samples to be collected for testing from the lot
to be:
(1) For a lot weighing less than 5 pounds, not less than 10
grams;
(2) For a lot weighing 5 pounds or more but less than 10
pounds, not less than 15 grams; and
(3) For a lot weighing 10 pounds or more but not more
than 15 pounds, not less than 20 grams.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Harvest batch” means the useable flower and trim
contained within one or more specific lots of cannabis grown by a
cannabis cultivation facility from one or more seeds or cuttings of
the same strain of cannabis and harvested on or before a specified
final date of harvest.
(b) “Lot” means:
(1) The flowers from one or more cannabis plants of the
same harvest batch, in a quantity that weighs 15 pounds or less;
(2) The leaves or other plant matter from one or more
cannabis plants of the same harvest batch, other than full female
flowers, in a quantity that weighs 45 pounds or less; or
(3) The wet flower, leaves or other plant matter from one or
more cannabis plants of the same harvest batch used only for
extraction, in a quantity that weighs 150 pounds or less, within 2
hours of harvest.
Secs. 4-6. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)